data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_BR.aff
SFX m   0       -se-lhes-ia    prazer
SFX m   0       -se-lhes-ia    subir
SFX m   0       -se-lhes-ia    valer
SFX m   0       -se-lhes-ia    vestir
SFX m   0       -se-lhes-ia    vir
SFX m   0       -se-lhes-iam   [aüu]ir
SFX m   0       -se-lhes-iam   boiar
SFX m   0       -se-lhes-iam   denegrir
SFX m   0       -se-lhes-iam   gar
SFX m   0       -se-lhes-iam   gir
SFX m   0       -se-lhes-iam   iuvar
SFX m   0       -se-lhes-iam   oer
SFX m   0       -se-lhes-iam   oibir
SFX m   0       -se-lhes-iam   prazer
SFX m   0       -se-lhes-iam   subir
SFX m   0       -se-lhes-iam   ter
SFX m   0       -se-lhes-iam   valer
SFX m   0       -se-lhes-iam   vestir
SFX m   0       -se-lhes-iam   vir
SFX m   ir      í-la-á         air
SFX m   ir      í-la-á         [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -la-á          [qg]uir
SFX m   ar      á-la-á         boiar
SFX m   0       -la-á          denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-la-á         gar
SFX m   r       -la-á          gir
SFX m   0       -la-á          iuvar
SFX m   er      ê-la-á         oer
SFX m   r       -la-á          oibir
SFX m   er      ê-la-á         prazer
SFX m   r       -la-á          subir
SFX m   er      ê-la-á         valer
SFX m   r       -la-á          vestir
SFX m   r       -la-á          vir
SFX m   ir      í-la-ão         air
SFX m   ir      í-la-ão         [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -la-ão          [qg]uir
SFX m   ar      á-la-ão         boiar
SFX m   0       -la-ão          denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-la-ão         gar
SFX m   r       -la-ão          gir
SFX m   0       -la-ão          iuvar
SFX m   er      ê-la-ão         oer
SFX m   r       -la-ão          oibir
SFX m   er      ê-la-ão         prazer
SFX m   r       -la-ão          subir
SFX m   er      ê-la-ão         valer
SFX m   r       -la-ão          vestir
SFX m   r       -la-ão          vir
SFX m   ir      í-la-emos      air
SFX m   ir      í-la-emos      [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -la-emos       [qg]uir
SFX m   ar      á-la-emos      boiar
SFX m   r       -la-emos       denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-la-emos      gar
SFX m   r       -la-emos       gir
SFX m   ar      á-la-emos      iuvar
SFX m   er      ê-la-emos      oer
SFX m   r       -la-emos       oibir
SFX m   er      ê-la-emos      prazer
SFX m   r       -la-emos       subir
SFX m   er      ê-la-emos      ter
SFX m   er      ê-la-emos      valer
SFX m   r       -la-emos       vestir
SFX m   r       -la-emos       vir
SFX m   ir      í-las-á        air
SFX m   ir      í-las-á        [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -las-á         [qg]uir
SFX m   ar      á-las-á        boiar
SFX m   r       -las-á         denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-las-á        gar
SFX m   r       -las-á         gir
SFX m   ar      á-las-á        iuvar
SFX m   er      ê-las-á         oer
SFX m   r       -las-á         oibir
SFX m   er      ê-las-á        prazer
SFX m   r       -las-á         subir
SFX m   er      ê-las-á        valer
SFX m   r       -las-á         vestir
SFX m   r       -las-á         vir
SFX m   ir      í-las-ão        air
SFX m   ir      í-las-ão        [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -las-ão         [qg]uir
SFX m   ar      á-las-ão        boiar
SFX m   r       -las-ão         denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-las-ão        gar
SFX m   r       -las-ão         gir
SFX m   ar      á-las-ão        iuvar
SFX m   er      ê-las-ão         oer
SFX m   r       -las-ão         oibir
SFX m   er      ê-las-ão        prazer
SFX m   r       -las-ão         subir
SFX m   er      ê-las-ão        valer
SFX m   r       -las-ão         vestir
SFX m   r       -las-ão         vir
SFX m   ir      í-las-emos     air
SFX m   ir      í-las-emos     [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -las-emos      [qg]uir
SFX m   ar      á-las-emos     boiar
SFX m   r       -las-emos      denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-las-emos     gar
SFX m   r       -las-emos      gir
SFX m   ar      á-las-emos     iuvar
SFX m   er      ê-las-emos     oer
SFX m   r       -las-emos      oibir
SFX m   er      ê-las-emos     prazer
SFX m   r       -las-emos      subir
SFX m   er      ê-las-emos     ter
SFX m   er      ê-las-emos     valer
SFX m   r       -las-emos      vestir
SFX m   r       -las-emos      vir
SFX m   ir      í-la-ia        air
SFX m   ir      í-la-ia        [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -la-ia         [qg]uir
SFX m   ar      á-la-ia        boiar
SFX m   r       -la-ia         denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-la-ia        gar
SFX m   r       -la-ia         gir
SFX m   ar      á-la-ia        iuvar
SFX m   ir      í-lo-ia        air
SFX m   ir      í-lo-ia        [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -lo-ia         [qg]uir
SFX m   ar      á-lo-ia        boiar
SFX m   r       -lo-ia         denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-lo-ia        gar
SFX m   r       -lo-ia         gir
SFX m   ar      á-lo-ia        iuvar
SFX m   ir      í-la-iam       air
SFX m   ir      í-la-iam       [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -la-iam        [qg]uir
SFX m   ar      á-la-iam       boiar
SFX m   r       -la-iam        denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-la-iam       gar
SFX m   r       -la-iam        gir
SFX m   ar      á-la-iam       iuvar
SFX m   ir      í-lo-iam       [aüu]ir
SFX m   ar      á-lo-iam       boiar
SFX m   r       -lo-iam        denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-lo-iam       gar
SFX m   r       -lo-iam        gir
SFX m   ar      á-lo-iam       iuvar
SFX m   ir      í-la-íamos       air
SFX m   ir      í-la-íamos       [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -la-íamos        [qg]uir
SFX m   ar      á-la-íamos       boiar
SFX m   r       -la-íamos        denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-la-íamos       gar
SFX m   r       -la-íamos        gir
SFX m   ar      á-la-íamos       iuvar
SFX m   ir      í-lo-íamos       [aüu]ir
SFX m   ar      á-lo-íamos       boiar
SFX m   r       -lo-íamos        denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-lo-íamos       gar
SFX m   r       -lo-íamos        gir
SFX m   ar      á-lo-íamos       iuvar
SFX m   ir      í-las-ia       air
SFX m   ir      í-las-ia       [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -las-ia        [qg]uir
SFX m   ar      á-las-ia       boiar
SFX m   r       -las-ia        denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-las-ia       gar
SFX m   r       -las-ia        gir
SFX m   ar      á-las-ia       iuvar
SFX m   ir      í-los-ia       air
SFX m   ir      í-los-ia       [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -los-ia        [qg]uir
SFX m   ar      á-los-ia       boiar
SFX m   r       -los-ia        denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-los-ia       gar
SFX m   r       -los-ia        gir
SFX m   ar      á-los-ia       iuvar
SFX m   ir      í-las-ias       air
SFX m   ir      í-las-ias       [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -las-ias        [qg]uir
SFX m   ar      á-las-ias       boiar
SFX m   r       -las-ias        denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-las-ias       gar
SFX m   r       -las-ias        gir
SFX m   ar      á-las-ias       iuvar
SFX m   ir      í-los-ias       air
SFX m   ir      í-los-ias       [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -los-ias        [qg]uir
SFX m   ar      á-los-ias       boiar
SFX m   r       -los-ias        denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-los-ias       gar
SFX m   r       -los-ias        gir
SFX m   ar      á-los-ias       iuvar
SFX m   ir      í-las-iam      air
SFX m   ir      í-las-iam      [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -las-iam       [qg]uir
SFX m   ar      á-las-iam      boiar
SFX m   r       -las-iam       denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-las-iam      gar
SFX m   r       -las-iam       gir
SFX m   ar      á-las-iam      iuvar
SFX m   ir      í-los-iam      air
SFX m   ir      í-los-iam      [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -los-iam       [qg]uir
SFX m   ar      á-los-iam      boiar
SFX m   r       -los-iam       denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-los-iam      gar
SFX m   r       -los-iam       gir
SFX m   ar      á-los-iam      iuvar
SFX m   ir      í-las-íamos      air
SFX m   ir      í-las-íamos      [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -las-íamos       [qg]uir
SFX m   ar      á-las-íamos      boiar
SFX m   r       -las-íamos       denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-las-íamos      gar
SFX m   r       -las-íamos       gir
SFX m   ar      á-las-íamos      iuvar
SFX m   ir      í-los-íamos      air
SFX m   ir      í-los-íamos      [^qg]uir
