data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_BR.dic
abjugar/cmYMjL
abjurgar/cmYjL
abluir/cmjL
abnuir/cmjL
abougar/cmYMjL
abster/cmMbj
achegar/cmYMjLÂ
aconchegar/cmYMjLÂ
adegar/cmYMjL
adengar/cmYMjL
adjungir/cmMjL
adregar/cmYMjL
advir/cmMjL
afagar/cmYMjLÂ
afingir/cmj
afligir/cmMjLÂË
agalegar/cmYMjL
agir/cmjLÀÍÑ
ajesuitar/cmYMjL
ajudengar/cmYMjL
alargar/cmYMjLÂÀ
aldeagar/cmYMjL
alfandegar/cmYMjLÂ
almecegar/cmYMjL
alongar/cmYMjL
aluir/cmjL
amagar/cmYMjL
amatungar/cmYMjL
amolegar/cmYMjL
amovir/cmj
anafragar/cmYMjL
apagar/cmYMjLÂ
aprochegar/cmYMjL
arengar/cmYjL
arraigar/cmYMjLÂ
arreigar/cmYMjLÂ
arrenegar/cmYjLÂ
arrigar/cmYMjLÂ
arrugar/cmYMjLÂ
atartarugar/cmYMjL
atribuir/cmjLÃÀÂÈÑ
aturgar/cmYMjL
autodesligar/cmYMjL
avancargar/cmYMjL
averdugar/cmYMjL
avir/cmMjLÂÀ
bagar/cmYMjLÂò
balangar/cmYMjL
berregar/cmYMjL
bingar/cmYMjL
blogar/cmYjL
boiar/cmYMjLÂò
borregar/cmYMjLò
buir/cmjL
burgar/cmYMjL
cafangar/cmYMjL
cagar/cmYjL
calemburgar/cmYMjL
cangar/cmYMjLÂ
capengar/cmYMjL
carangar/cmMjLò
carregar/cmYMjLÂÀËÎúÃ
catalogar/cmYjL
catracegar/cmYMjL
caxingar/cmYMjL
centrifugar/cmYMjLà
chagar/cmYMjLò
chamegar/cmYMjLò
charangar/cmYMjL
chegar/cmYMjLÀË
choramigar/cmYMjL
chumbregar/cmYMjL
circunavegar/cmYjL
circunvagar/cmYMjL
circunvoluir/cmjL
coibir/cmjL
coligar/cmYMjLÀ
comboiar/cmYMjL
compungir/cmMjL
comungar/cmYMjLÂ
concluir/cmjL
confluir/cmjL
conjugar/cmYjLÂÎ
conseguir/cmjLÂ
constringir/cmMjL
contrair/cmjLÂ
contravir/cmMjL
convir/cmMjLÂÀ
corroer/cmMjL
debagar/cmYMjL
decair/cmMjL
defluir/cmjL
delegar/cmYjLÈ
delingar/cmYMjL
demovir/cmMjL
denegrir/cmMjL
derraigar/cmYMjL
derreigar/cmYMjL
derrogar/cmYNj
dervirgar/cmYMjL
desbarrigar/cmYMjL
descomovir/cmMjL
desgregar/cmYjL
desnarigar/cmYMjL
despostigar/cmYMjL
desrevestir/cmMjL
destituir/cmjL
desvirgar/cmYMjL
deter/cmMbjÑ
detrair/cmMjL
devulgar/cmYMjL
difluir/cmjL
diluir/cmjL
dirigir/cmjLÈÑÃÀ
disgregar/cmYjL
distinguir/cmjLÓÈ
distribuir/cmjLÀ
divagar/cmYjL
djumbair/cmMjL
domingar/cmYjLò
eligir/cmMjL
embagar/cmYMjL
embelgar/cmYjL
embizugar/cmYMjL
embougar/cmYMjL
empangar/cmYMjL
empocilgar/cmYMjL
empulgar/cmYMjL
encarangar/cmYjLÂ
encorrugir/cmMjL
enesgar/cmYMjL
engalgar/cmYMjL
enjalgar/cmYMjL
enlagar/cmYMjL
enrugar/cmYMjLÂ
entaleigar/cmYMjL
entapigar/cmYMjL
entrerregar/cmYMjL
envesgar/cmYMjL
enxaugar/cmYMjL
epilogar/cmYjL
esbangar/cmYMjL
esborregar/cmYMjL
escamurrengar/cmYMjL
esfandegar/cmYMjL
esfornigar/cmYMjL
esgargar/cmYMjL
esmagar/cmYMjL
espadagar/cmYMjL
espargir/cmMjL
espernegar/cmYMjL
espulgar/cmYjL
estingar/cmYMjL
estordegar/cmYMjL
estragar/cmYjL
estrigar/cmYMjL
estrugir/cmMjL
everter/cmMbj
exgregar/cmYMjL
expungir/cmMjL
extinguir/cmjLÃ
fandangar/cmYMjLò
figar/cmYMjLZ2
folegar/cmYMjLÀÂ
formigar/cmYMjL
frangir/cmMjLÀÂ
frutegar/cmYMjL
fumigar/cmYjL
fustigar/cmYjL
gingar/cmYjL
grongar/cmYMjL
hexassubstituir/cm
imergir/cmMjLÀ
indagar/cmYjL
infringir/cmMjL
insurgir/cmMjLÀ
intervir/cmMjL
involuir/cmjLÂ
jangar/cmYMjL
julgar/cmYMjLÏìÀÃ
labregar/cmYMjLò
lategar/cmYMjL
legar/cmYjLÀÂòÑ
levigar/cmYjL
lobregar/cmYMjL
lugar/cmYMjL
manter/cmMbjÀÂ
meigar/cmYMjLò
mergar/cmYMjL
mitigar/cmYMjL
molgar/cmYMjLÀ
morangar/cmYMjL
mossegar/cmYMjLò
mungangar/cmYMjL
naufragar/cmYMjLò
noctivagar/cmYMjL
obstruir/cmjLÂÜ
ofegar/cmYjL
ougar/cmYMjLÂ
pangar/cmYMjL
pegar/cmYjLÀÂ
perigar/cmYMjL
perseguir/cmjL
pespegar/cmYMjL
pingar/cmYMjLÂ
pitosgar/cmYMjL
pongar/cmYMjLÂ
pragar/cmYMjL
preitegar/cmYMjL
profligar/cmYjL
promiscuir/cmjL
prosseguir/cmMjL
psicologar/cmYMjL
quingar/cmYMjL
rangar/cmYMjL
rasmolgar/cmYMjL
redigir/cmMjL
refunfumegar/cmYMjL
remelgar/cmYMjLó
repolgar/cmYMjL
resmelengar/cmYMjL
respigar/cmYMjL
restituir/cmjL
reter/cmMbj
retrosseguir/cmMjL
roçagar/cmYMjL
rogar/cmYNjÈ
rusgar/cmYMjL
samangar/cmYMjL
segregar/cmYMjLÂ
seramangar/cmYMjL
sobressair/cmMjL
sofregar/cmYMjL
solvir/cmMjL
subir/cmMjLóÀ
sufragar/cmYMjL
sujugar/cmYMjL
talingar/cmYMjLÂ
teledirigir/cmMjL
tibungar/cmYMjL
torcegar/cmYMjL
trafegar/cmYMjLò
transigir/cmMjL
trejugar/cmYMjL
trigar/cmYMjLÂÄò
tuitar/cmYMjLÀÂÃ
ungir/cmMjL
vagar/cmYjLÔ
veniagar/cmYMjL
verrugar/cmYMjLò
visgar/cmYMjLÂ
xingar/cmYMjL
zingar/cmYMjLÀ
